Utah statutes.
57-26-106.   Enforcement of security interest in rents.

(1)  An assignee may enforce an assignment of rents using one or more of the methods specified in Sections 57-26-107, 57-26-108, and 57-26-109 or any other method sufficient to enforce the assignment under law of this state other than this chapter.

(2)  From the date of enforcement, the assignee or, in the case of enforcement by appointment of a receiver under Section 57-26-107, the receiver is entitled to collect all rents that:

(a)  have accrued but remain unpaid on that date; and

(b)  accrue on or after that date, as those rents accrue.

